Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.010

Civil legal aid oversight committee.

(1) There is created a civil legal aid oversight committee consisting of the following members:

(a) Three persons appointed by the supreme court from a list of nominees submitted by the access to justice board, one of whom at the time of appointment is income eligible to receive state-funded civil legal aid;

(b) Two persons appointed by the board for judicial administration;

(c) Two senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate; and two members of the house of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(d) One person appointed by the Washington state bar association; and

(e) One person appointed by the governor.

(2) During the term of his or her appointment, an appointee may not be employed by a state-funded legal aid provider.

(3) Members shall each serve a three-year term, subject to renewal for no more than one additional three-year term. The oversight committee shall develop rules that provide for the staggering of terms so that, after the first three years of the committee's existence, the terms of one-third of the members expire each year. Members of the oversight committee receive no compensation for their services as members of the oversight committee, but may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses in accordance with rules adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) The oversight committee shall: Oversee the activities of the office of civil legal aid created in RCW 2.53.020; review the performance of the director of the office of civil legal aid; and may, from time to time, make recommendations to the supreme court, the access to justice board, and the legislature regarding the provision of civil legal aid funded through RCW 2.53.030.

[ 2005 c 105 s 4.]